Utah statutes.
48-1d-1201.   Governing law.

(1)  The law of the jurisdiction in which the statement of qualification or equivalent filing of a foreign limited liability partnership is filed governs:

(a)  the internal affairs of the foreign limited liability partnership; and

(b)  the liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign limited liability partnership.

(2)  A foreign limited liability partnership is not precluded from registering to do business in this state because of any difference between the law of this state and the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited liability partnership's statement of qualification or equivalent filing is filed.

(3)  Registration of a foreign limited liability partnership to do business in this state does not authorize the foreign limited liability partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a domestic limited liability partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state as a limited liability partnership.

(4) (a)  The division may permit a tribal limited liability partnership to apply for authority to transact business in the state in the same manner as a foreign limited liability partnership formed in another state.

(b)  If a tribal limited liability partnership elects to apply for authority to transact business in the state, for purposes of this chapter, the tribal limited liability partnership shall be treated in the same manner as a foreign limited liability partnership formed under the laws of another state.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

